Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB806.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XV-OPENNSYLVANIA STUDENT JOURNALISM PROTECTIONSection 1501-O. Scope of article.This article relates to the provision of free speech rights for student journalists in school media.Section 1502-O. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920 "School entity." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth."School official." A superintendent, principal or the designee of the superintendent or principal of a school entity."School-sponsored media." Any material that is prepared, substantially written, published or broadcast by a student journalist at a school entity."School-sponsored media program." A journalism program or class offered by a school entity that produces school-sponsored media."Student editor." A student journalist appointed by the student-media advisor."Student journalist." A student who gathers, compiles, writes, edits, photographs, records, illustrates or prepares information for dissemination in school-sponsored media."Student-media advisor." An individual who meets all of the following criteria:(1) The individual is employed, appointed or designated by a school entity to supervise or provide instruction relating to school-sponsored media.(2) The individual is not a student currently enrolled at the school entity.Section 1503-O. Free speech rights for student journalists.(a) Policies.--Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, a school entity that has a school-sponsored media program on or after the effective date of this subsection shall adopt policies or amend the school entity's existing policies for the purpose of complying with this article. The policies shall include the 20250HB0806PN0834 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rights and responsibilities of student editors, student journalists and student-media advisors in accordance with this article and 22 Pa. Code § 12.9 (relating to freedom of expression).(b) Unauthorized expression.--In accordance with the regulations promulgated by 22 Pa. Code § 12.9, a form of student expression shall not be authorized or protected by a school entity's policies if the form of student expression is found to be any of the following:(1) Libelous, slanderous or obscene.(2) An unwarranted invasion of privacy.(3) Violating Federal or State law.(4) Inciting students to commit an unlawful act or violate the school entity's policies.(5) Materially and substantially disrupting the orderly operation of the school entity.(c) Prior restraint prohibited.--Except for a form of student expression prohibited under subsection (b), a school entity's policies shall ensure that there is no prior restraint of a form of student expression prepared for use in the publication or broadcast of school-sponsored media.Section 1504-O. Limitations on school officials and school entities.(a) Publications and broadcasts.--A school official shall be prohibited from any of the following:(1) Participating in the approval of school-sponsored media before the publication or broadcast of the school-sponsored media in accordance with this article. The approval for a publication or broadcast of school-sponsored media shall be granted solely by a student editor under section 20250HB0806PN0834 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1505-O(c).(2) Serving as a member of the school-sponsored media program.(b) Media facilities.--A school entity may not limit access of a student journalist to the school entity's student media facilities if the student journalist's use of the media facilities will not result in an unauthorized and unprotected form of student expression as specified under section 1503-O(b).Section 1505-O. School-sponsored media program.(a) Content selection.--Subject to the limitations of a school entity's policies, a student editor shall approve, reject or exclude all content of school-sponsored media publications and broadcasts and oversee the operation of the school-sponsored media program.(b) Student-media advisors.--A student-media advisor shall act solely as an educator and consultant for student journalists during the school-sponsored media publication and broadcast process.(c) Approval process.--School-sponsored media shall be submitted to the student editor for approval before the school-sponsored media is published or broadcast. The student editor shall determine if the school-sponsored media violates the school entity's policies. If the student editor determines that the school-sponsored media violates the school entity's policies, the school-sponsored media may not be published or broadcast. The student editor may exclude school-sponsored media from publication or broadcast on the basis of limited available space or time within the publication or broadcast.(d) Rejection or exclusion.--A student editor shall provide a written explanation for the rejection or exclusion of school-20250HB0806PN0834 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sponsored media prepared by a student journalist for a publication or broadcast.(e) Media law training.--Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, student journalists, in conjunction with the student-media advisor, may conduct a lesson in media law for student journalists before the student journalists participate in the school-sponsored media program. The lesson shall notify the student journalists of their rights as journalists under this article and demonstrate examples of school-sponsored media that violate the school entity's policies. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to create additional expenses for a school entity to conduct the lesson.(f) Official statements.--School-sponsored media shall be considered a form of student expression. School-sponsored media may not be considered an official statement from the school entity.(g) Construction.--Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a student editor from exercising action to cease the publication or broadcast of school-sponsored media that is an unauthorized and unprotected form of student expression as specified under section 1503-O(b).Section 1506-O. Protections for student-media advisors.A student-media advisor may not, under any circumstances, be dismissed, suspended, disciplined, reassigned or transferred by a school official for any of the following actions:(1) Taking reasonable and appropriate action to protect a student journalist engaging in conduct established under the school entity's policies.(2) Refusing to infringe on the conduct by a student journalist that is protected by the school entity's policies, 20250HB0806PN0834 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the First Amendment of the Constitution of the United States or section 7 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of Article XV-O of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0806PN0834 - 6 - 1234567